src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 2SYLL_KULGAD_V   !!= * __@CODE@__ 55 verbs

!! Distinct from SODDAD with short vowel in past tense (du)
!! Turns out it was not distinct after all. Preper for fusing KULGAD and SODDAD

:  VINFINITES_SODDAD ;
+Ind+Prs: EVEN_PRS_SODDAD ;
+Ind+Prt: EVEN_PRT_SODDAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_SODDAD ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_SODDAD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VHIGH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !porgâškyettiđ
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L_CLEN ; ! ML: No Der/l for the SODDAD verbs
:â^VHIGH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; ! or perhaps: C_PASS_SH ; !porgui ostui

!LEXICON EVEN_PRT_KULGAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
!+Sg1:i^VHIGH%>m K ;
!+Sg2:i^VHIGH%>h K ;
!+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>i3 K ;
!+Du1:á^WG^CLEN^VHIGH%>im K ; ! SODDAD RLEN
!+Du2:á^WG^CLEN^VHIGH%>id K ; ! SODDAD RLEN
!+Du3:á^WG^CLEN^VHIGH%>in K ; ! SODDAD RLEN
!+Pl1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>im K ;
!+Pl2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>id K ;
!+Pl3:i^CLEN^VHIGH%>i3 K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_SODDAD
+V: 2SYLL_SODDAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_SODDAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_SODDAD_V ;

!LEXICON 2SYLL_SODDAD_TV
!+V+TV: 2SYLL_SODDAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_SODDAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 6 verbs

! kalgâđ | kaalgâm | á-á  | kälgih  | kalgim | kä^RVlg
! šoddâđ | šoodâm  | a-a  | šaddeh  | šoddim | ša^RVdd
! kulgâđ | kuulgâm | o-á  | kolgeh  | kulgim | ko^RVlg
! ä>a, a>o, o>u

VINFINITES_SODDAD ;
+Ind+Prs: EVEN_PRS_SODDAD ;
+Ind+Prt: EVEN_PRT_SODDAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_SODDAD ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_SODDAD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VHIGH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; !porgâškyettiđ
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L ; ! Note: See comment in 2SYLL_KULGAD "No Der/l for SODDAD..
:â^VHIGH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !

LEXICON VINFINITES_SODDAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:â^VHIGH%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:â^VHIGH%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:i^VHIGH%>i5 K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+PrsPrc:e^CLEN%>e K ; ! trigger for u > o
+PrfPrc:â^VHIGH%>m K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^CLEN%> C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:â^WG^VHIGH VABESS ;
+VGen:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Actio+Nom:â^VHIGH%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:â^VHIGH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:â^VHIGH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:â^VHIGH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:â^VHIGH%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:â^VHIGH%>m FLAG_3LITTER ;

LEXICON EVEN_PRS_SODDAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Sg2:a^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Sg3:á K ;       ! iätá (CSH tt-t), šadda, viggá
+Sg3+Err/Orth:á^CSH K ;
+Sg3+Err/Orth:â^CSH K ;
+Sg3+Err/Orth:â K ;
+Du1:e^CLEN%>en K ;
+Du2:â^VHIGH^RVSH%>vettee K ; ! etâvettee (CSH) šoddâvettee, viggâvettee
+Du3:â^VHIGH%>v K ;
+Pl1:â^VHIGH%>p K ;
+Pl2:â^VHIGH^RVSH%>vetteđ K ;
+Pl3:e%>h K ;  ! loheh

LEXICON EVEN_PRT_SODDAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:i^VHIGH%>m K ;
+Sg2:i^VHIGH%>h K ;
+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>i3 K ;
+Du1:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>im K ; ! SODDAD RLEN
+Du2:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>id K ; ! SODDAD RLEN
+Du3:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>in K ; ! SODDAD RLEN
+Pl1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>im K ;
+Pl2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>id K ;
+Pl3:i^CLEN^VHIGH%>i3 K ;


LEXICON EVEN_POT_SODDAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG^CLEN%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG^CLEN%>eh K ;
+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>š K ;
+Du1:â^WG^VHIGH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+Du3:â^WG^VHIGH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:â^WG^VHIGH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:â^WG^VHIGH%>žeh K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_SODDAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+Sg3:o^WG%>s K ;
+Du1:o^CLEN%>on K ;
+Du2:e^CLEN%>e K ;
+Du3:o^CLEN%>os K ;
+Pl1:o^CLEN%>p K ;
+Pl2:â^VHIGH%>đ K ;
+Pl3:o^CLEN%>os K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_TOOLLAD
+V: 2SYLL_TOOLLAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_TOOLLAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_TOOLLAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_TOOLLAD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_TOOLLAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_TOOLLAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 12 verbs

! suggested stem = tuáll
!Impossible to see the differences in diphtong length

VINFINITES_TOOLLAD ; ! same as in MOONNAD
+Ind: EVEN_IND_TOOLLAD ; ! should be separated from MOONNAD
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VBACK%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_TOOLLAD ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_TOOLLAD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ;
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl^WG 3_DERIVED_L_CLEN ;
:â^CSH^VBACK^RVSH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH ; ! ? !tolluđ, tollui

LEXICON VINFINITES_TOOLLAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:â^VBACK%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:â^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VBACK%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>i3 K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:â^WG^RLEN K ;
+PrsPrc:e^CLEN%>e K ; ! trigger for u > o
+PrfPrc:â^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ; !toollâm
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^CLEN%> C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH VABESS ;
+VGen:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Actio+Nom:â^VBACK^RLEN%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:â^CSH^VBACK^RVSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:â^CSH^VBACK^RVSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:â^CSH^VBACK^RVSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Com+Err/Orth:â^CSH^VBACK^RVSH%>mijn K ;
+Actio+Ess:â^CSH^VBACK^RVSH%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:â^WG^VBACK%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:â^VBACK^RLEN%>m FLAG_3LITTER ;

LEXICON EVEN_IND_TOOLLAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:â^WG^VBACK%>m K ;    	! toolâm ! uá > o
+Prs+Sg2:a^WG^VBACK%>h K ;     ! toolah
+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH K ;       		! tuálá
+Prs+Du1:e%>en K ;  			! tuálleen
+Prs+Du2:â^CSH^VBACK^RVSH%>vettee K ; 	! tolâvettee
+Prs+Du3:â^VBACK^RLEN%>v K ;         ! toollâv
+Prs+Pl1:â^VBACK%>p K ;  ! toollâp
+Prs+Pl2:â^CSH^VBACK^RVSH%>vetteđ K ; 	 ! tolâvetteđ
+Prs+Pl3:i^CSH%>h K ;           ! tuálih
+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:i%>h K ;

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ;				! toollim
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK^RLEN%>h K ;				! toollih
+Prt+Sg3:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>i K ;			! toolâi
+Prt+Du1:á^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ; ! tooláim
+Prt+Du2:á^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ; ! tooláid
+Prt+Du3:á^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>in K ;	! tooláin
+Prt+Pl1:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ;	! toolâim
+Prt+Pl2:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ;	! toolâid
+Prt+Pl3:i^VBACK^RVSH%>i5 K ;			! tollii

LEXICON EVEN_POT_TOOLLAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG%>em K ; ! tuáleem
+Sg2:e^WG%>eh K ; ! tuáleeh
+Sg3:â^WG^VBACK%>š K ; ! toolâš
+Du1:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeen K ; ! tolâžeen
+Du2:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>švettee K ; ! toolâšvettee
+Du3:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žává K ; ! tolâžává
+Pl1:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žep K ; ! tolâžep
+Pl2:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>švetteđ K ; ! toolâšvetteđ
+Pl3:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeh K ; ! tolâžeh

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_TOOLLAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:â^WG^VBACK K ; ! toolâ
+Sg3:u^WG%>s K ; ! tuálus
+Du1:o^RVSH%>on K ; ! tuálloon
+Du2:e^RVSH%>e K ; 		! tuállee
+Du3:u%>s K ; 	! tuállus
+Pl1:u%>p K ;	! tuállup
+Pl2:â^VBACK^RLEN%>đ K ; ! toollâđ
+Pl3:u^RLEN%>s K ; ! tuállus


LEXICON 2SYLL_OPPAD
+V: 2SYLL_OPPAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_OPPAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_OPPAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_OPPAD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_OPPAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_OPPAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 12 verbs

!! suggested stem = tuáll
!! Impossible to see the differences in diphtong length

VINFINITES_OPPAD ; ! same as in MOONNAD
+Ind: EVEN_IND_OPPAD ; ! should be separated from MOONNAD
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_OPPAD ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_OPPAD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/d:â^WG%>d 3_KUIKETTID ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L ;
:â^VBACK^RVSH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RLEN ; ! ?
